apertium-ca-it.it.dix
    <pardef n="complic/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amor/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="irid/e__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anchorm/an__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>an</l> 
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>en</l> 
        <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ancorché__cnjcoo">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="siccome__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e r="RL" lm="come">
      <p>
        <l><a/>come</l> 
        <r>come</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="a condizione che">
        <i>a<b/>condizione<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="affare">
        <i>affar</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="allora">
        <i>allora</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="altrimenti">
        <i>altrimenti</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="amore">
        <i>amor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="anticoagulante">
        <i>anticoagulant</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="antipode">
        <i>antipod</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="arachide">
        <i>arachid</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aragonese">
        <i>aragones</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aspiratore">
        <i>aspirator</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="aspirazione">
        <i>aspirazion</i> 
        <par n="irid/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="avversione">
        <i>avversion</i> 
        <par n="irid/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="balcone">
        <i>balcon</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bancone">
        <i>bancon</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="barbiere">
        <i>barbier</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="barile">
        <i>baril</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="basta che">
        <i>basta<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="bilione">
        <i>bilion</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="borghese">
        <i>borghes</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="brace">
        <i>brac</i> 
        <par n="irid/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="calcare">
        <i>calcar</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="campione">
        <i>campion</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cardinale">
        <i>cardinal</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cece">
        <i>cec</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ciò nonostante">
        <i>ciò<b/>nonostante</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="col fine di">
        <i>col<b/>fine<b/>di</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="colore">
        <i>color</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="combustibile">
        <i>combustibil</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e r="LR" lm="come">
        <i>come</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="come vuoi che">
        <i>come<b/>vuoi<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="complice">
        <i>complic</i> 
        <par n="complic/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="comune">
        <i>comun</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="conseguentemente">
        <i>conseguentemente</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="conservante">
        <i>conservant</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="console">
        <i>consol</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cordone">
        <i>cordon</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="crimine">
        <i>crimin</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="cuore">
        <i>cuor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dando per scontato che">
        <i>dando<b/>per<b/>scontato<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dato che">
        <i>dato<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dato il caso in cui">
        <i>dato<b/>il<b/>caso<b/>in<b/>cui</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="demone">
        <i>demon</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="dirigibile">
        <i>dirigibil</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="e">
        <i>e</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="eccetto che">
        <i>eccetto<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="escluso che">
        <i>escluso<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="esemplare">
        <i>esemplar</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="giacché">
        <i>giacché</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="giullare">
        <i>giullar</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="glutine">
        <i>glutin</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="in modo che">
        <i>in<b/>modo<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="indice">
        <i>indic</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ipotizzando che">
        <i>ipotizzando<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="istante">
        <i>istant</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="locale">
        <i>local</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="ma">
        <i>ma</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="male">
        <i>mal</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="malgrado">
        <i>malgrado</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="marcatore">
        <i>marcator</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="mentre">
        <i>mentre</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="meteorite">
        <i>meteorit</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="morale">
        <i>moral</i> 
        <par n="irid/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nel caso in cui">
        <i>nel<b/>caso<b/>in<b/>cui</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="nella misura in cui">
        <i>nella<b/>misura<b/>in<b/>cui</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="né">
        <i>né</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="o">
        <i>o</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="orrore">
        <i>orror</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="per molto che">
        <i>per<b/>molto<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="per tutto ciò">
        <i>per<b/>tutto<b/>ciò</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="perché">
        <i>perché</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="pertanto">
        <i>pertanto</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="possibile">
        <i>possibil</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="prima che">
        <i>prima<b/>che</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rettile">
        <i>rettil</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="rituale">
        <i>ritual</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="se">
        <i>se</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="sebbene">
        <i>sebbene</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="secondo">
        <i>secondo</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="settore">
        <i>settor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="siccome">
        <i>siccome</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="solo con">
        <i>solo<b/>con</i> 
        <par n="siccome__cnjadv" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="stile">
        <i>stil</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="televisore">
        <i>televisor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="tumore">
        <i>tumor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="valore">
        <i>valor</i> 
        <par n="amor/e__n" /> 
    </e>
    <e lm="è giusto dire">
        <i>è<b/>giusto<b/>dire</i> 
        <par n="ancorché__cnjcoo" /> 
    </e>
